Arkansas, session 2025, SB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-4-109(c)(2)(A), concerning the
qualifications of state and county commissioners, election officials, poll
workers, and certified election monitors, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this
section, a person serving on the county board of election commissioners shall
not participate in the campaign of any candidate listed on a ballot or of a
write-in candidate seeking election in that county that falls under the
county board of election commissioners’ jurisdiction or authority.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-416(e)(2)(A) and (B), concerning the
counting of absentee ballots, are amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) The ballots shall first be counted for write-in votes by
the election officials.
(B) Then, at At the discretion of the county board of
election commissioners, the ballots may be either hand counted or counted on
an electronic vote tabulating device.
*SSS138*
03-06-2025 09:37:08 SSS138

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 SB308

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-615(e), concerning the tabulation of
votes, defective ballots, and certification of returns, is amended to read as
follows:
(e) The return printed by the electronic vote tabulating device, to
which the return of write-in, early, and absentee votes have been added,
shall constitute the official return of each polling site. All returns shall
be certified by the election officials in charge of the tabulation thereof in
the manner provided by law.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-6-102(a)(4), concerning the political
practices pledge and penalty for falsification, is repealed.
(4) Write-in candidates shall file the political practices
pledge at the time of filing the notice to be a write-in candidate.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-11-102(9), concerning content of the
calling document for an election to fill a vacancy, is repealed.
(9) The deadline for filing as a write-in candidate if
applicable;

/s/K. Hammer















03-06-2025 09:37:08 SSS138